src/fst/affixes/irregularverbs.lexc
LEXICON OOLLI/GenPresRel
     +1Sg+Rel:0%<aal%>lo´           Clitics ;     !  aallo´
     +2Sg+Rel:t%<aal%>lo´           Clitics ;     ! taallo´
    +3SgM+Rel:y%<aal%>lo´           Clitics ;     ! yaallo´
    +3SgF+Rel:t%<aal%>lo´           Clitics ;     ! taallo´
     +1Pl+Rel:n%<aal%>lo´           Clitics ;     ! naallo´
     +2Pl+Rel:t%<aal%>laan´´        Clitics ;     ! taallaan´
     +3Pl+Rel:y%<aal%>laan´´        Clitics ;     ! yaallaan´

     +1Sg+Rel:0%<aal%>o´            Clitics ;     !  aalo´
     +2Sg+Rel:t%<aal%>o´            Clitics ;     ! taalo´
    +3SgM+Rel:y%<aal%>o´            Clitics ;     ! yaalo´
    +3SgF+Rel:t%<aal%>o´            Clitics ;     ! taalo´
     +1Pl+Rel:n%<aal%>o´            Clitics ;     ! naalo´
     +2Pl+Rel:t%<aal%>aan       Clitics ;     ! taali´in
     +3Pl+Rel:y%<aal%>aan       Clitics ;     ! yaali´in


LEXICON OOLLI/GenPresAlt
     +1Sg+Sty/TODO:0%<aal%>laa          Clitics ;
     +2Sg+Sty/TODO:t%<aal%>laa          Clitics ;
    +3SgM+Sty/TODO:y%<aal%>laa          Clitics ;
    +3SgF+Sty/TODO:t%<aal%>laa          Clitics ;
     +1Pl+Sty/TODO:n%<aal%>laa          Clitics ;
     +2Pl+Sty/TODO:t%<aal%>laan         Clitics ;
     +3Pl+Sty/TODO:y%<aal%>laan         Clitics ;

LEXICON OOLLI/GenPresRedAbsAlt
     +1Sg+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:0%<aal%>la´          Clitics ;   !  aalla´
     +2Sg+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:y%<aal%>la´          Clitics ;   ! yaalla´
    +3SgM+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:y%<aal%>la´          Clitics ;   ! yaalla´
    +3SgF+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:t%<aal%>la´          Clitics ;   ! taalla´
     +1Pl+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:n%<aal%>la´          Clitics ;   ! naalla´
     +2Pl+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:y%<aal%>la´          Clitics ;   ! yaalla´
     +3Pl+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:y%<aal%>la´          Clitics ;   ! yaalla´

! TODO: check oollin imperative, doing by analogy here.
LEXICON OOLLI/Imp
    +Sg:o´ol        Clitics ;       ! oqo´ow
    +Pl:oo´lla      Clitics ;       ! oqoo´da

    +Neg+Sg:oo´ll%>in Clitics ;       ! o´qoon
    +Neg+Sg:oo´ll%>inin   Clitics ;       ! o´qoonin
    +Neg+Pl:ooll%>ini´na Clitics ;    ! oqooni´na


LEXICON HIGH
    :´      FINAL ;

LEXICON LOWHIGH
    :´´     FINAL ;


! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc  :
